New Jersey, session 221, A5121.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  There is appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection the sum of $23,725,000 from dedicated corporation business tax revenues pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution in the Preserve New Jersey Green Acres Fund, established pursuant to section 6 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-48), for the acquisition of lands by the State for recreation and conservation purposes in accordance with the provisions of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.).  Of the amount appropriated pursuant to this subsection, the sum of $3,765,000 is available due to interest earnings on the dedicated corporation business tax revenues pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution. b.    The funds appropriated pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be allocated for the acquisition of lands within the locations of the projects set forth in paragraphs (1) through (14) of this subsection: Project                                  County                  Municipality (1)  BARNEGAT BAY WATERSHED GREENWAY Monmouth           Freehold Twp Howell Twp Ocean                    Barnegat Twp Berkeley Twp Brick Twp Eagleswood Twp Jackson Twp Lacey Twp Lakewood Twp Little Egg Harbor Twp Ocean Twp Stafford Twp Toms River Twp (2)  CAPE MAY PENINSULA Cape May             Cape May City Cape May Point Boro Dennis Twp Lower Twp Middle Twp Ocean City Sea Isle City Upper Twp West Cape May Boro West Wildwood Boro Woodbine Boro (3)  CONNECTING HABITATS ACROSS NEW JERSEY (CHANJ) Atlantic                  Absecon City Atlantic City Buena Boro Buena Vista Twp Egg Harbor City Egg Harbor Twp Estell Manor City Galloway Twp Hamilton Twp Hammonton Town Mullica Twp Northfield City Port Republic City Somers Point City Bergen                   Norwood Boro Rutherford Boro Burlington             Bass River Twp Bordentown Twp Burlington City Burlington Twp Chesterfield Twp Eastampton Twp Evesham Twp Florence Twp Hainesport Twp Lumberton Twp Mansfield Twp Medford Twp Medford Lakes Boro Mount Laurel Twp New Hanover Twp North Hanover Twp Pemberton Twp Shamong Twp Southampton Twp Springfield Twp Tabernacle Twp Westampton Twp Camden                Chesilhurst Boro Clementon Boro Gloucester Twp Pine Hill Boro Waterford Twp Winslow Twp Cape May             Dennis Twp Lower Twp Middle Twp Upper Twp Woodbine Boro Cumberland         Bridgeton City Commercial Twp Deerfield Twp Downe Twp Fairfield Twp Greenwich Twp Hopewell Twp Maurice River Twp Millville City Stow Creek Twp Upper Deerfield Twp Vineland City Essex                      Fairfield Twp Livingston Twp Gloucester             Clayton Boro East Greenwich Twp Elk Twp Franklin Twp Glassboro Boro Greenwich Twp Harrison Twp Logan Twp Mantua Twp Monroe Twp Newfield Boro Paulsboro Boro South Harrison Twp West Deptford Twp Woolwich Twp Hunterdon            Alexandria Twp Bethlehem Twp Clinton Twp Delaware Twp East Amwell Twp Franklin Twp Frenchtown Boro Holland Twp Kingwood Twp Lebanon Boro Lebanon Twp Milford Boro Raritan Twp Readington Twp Tewksbury Twp Union Twp West Amwell Twp Mercer                   East Windsor Twp Hamilton Twp Hopewell Twp Lawrence Twp Pennington Boro Princeton Boro Robbinsville Twp West Windsor Twp Middlesex             Cranbury Twp East Brunswick Twp Middlesex Boro Milltown Boro Monroe Twp New Brunswick City North Brunswick Twp Old Bridge Twp Piscataway Twp Plainsboro Twp Sayreville Boro South Brunswick Twp Monmouth           Aberdeen Twp Allentown Boro Colts Neck Twp Farmingdale Boro Freehold Twp Holmdel Twp Howell Twp Manalapan Twp Marlboro Twp Millstone Twp Roosevelt Boro Upper Freehold Twp Morris                    Boonton Town Boonton Twp Chatham Boro Chester Boro Chester Twp Denville Twp East Hanover Twp Florham Park Boro Hanover Twp Harding Twp Jefferson Twp Kinnelon Boro Lincoln Park Boro Mendham Boro Mendham Twp Mine Hill Twp Morris Twp Mount Arlington Boro Mount Olive Twp Netcong Boro Parsippany-Troy Hills Twp Long Hill Twp Pequannock Twp Randolph Twp Rockaway Boro Rockaway Twp Roxbury Twp Washington Twp Wharton Boro Ocean                    Barnegat Twp Beachwood Boro Berkeley Twp Brick Twp Toms River Twp Eagleswood Twp Jackson Twp Lakehurst Boro Lakewood Twp Little Egg Harbor Twp Manchester Twp Ocean Twp Plumsted Twp Stafford Twp Passaic                   Ringwood Boro Wayne Twp West Milford Twp Salem                     Alloway Twp Carneys Point Twp Elsinboro Twp Mannington Twp Oldmans Twp Pilesgrove Twp Pittsgrove Twp Quinton Twp Salem City Upper Pittsgrove Twp Woodstown Boro Somerset               Bedminster Twp Bernards Twp Bernardsville Boro Bound Brook Boro Branchburg Twp Bridgewater Twp Far Hills Boro Franklin Twp Green Brook Twp Hillsborough Twp Manville Boro Montgomery Twp Peapack-Gladstone Boro Raritan Boro Rocky Hill Boro Somerville Boro Warren Twp Watchung Boro Sussex                    Andover Twp Branchville Boro Byram Twp Frankford Twp Fredon Twp Green Twp Hampton Twp Hardyston Twp Lafayette Twp Montague Twp Newton Town Ogdensburg Boro Sandyston Twp Sparta Twp Stillwater Twp Sussex Boro Vernon Twp Wantage Twp Union                     Berkeley Heights Twp Warren                   Allamuchy Twp Blairstown Twp Franklin Twp Frelinghuysen Twp Greenwich Twp Hardwick Twp Harmony Twp Hope Twp Independence Twp Knowlton Twp Liberty Twp Mansfield Twp Washington Twp White Twp (4)  CROSSROADS OF THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION Hunterdon            Delaware Twp East Amwell Twp Flemington Boro Franklin Twp Frenchtown Boro Kingwood Twp Lambertville City Raritan Twp Readington Twp Stockton Boro West Amwell Twp Mercer                   East Windsor Twp Ewing Twp Hamilton Twp Hightstown Boro Hopewell Boro Hopewell Twp Lawrence Twp Pennington Boro Princeton Boro Robbinsville Twp Trenton City West Windsor Twp Middlesex             Cranbury Twp Monroe Twp Plainsboro Twp South Brunswick Twp Monmouth           Allentown Boro Englishtown Boro Freehold Twp Manalapan Twp Marlboro Twp Millstone Twp Roosevelt Boro Upper Freehold Twp Morris                    Chatham Boro Chatham Twp Chester Boro Harding Twp Long Hill Twp Madison Boro Mendham Boro Mendham Twp Morris Plains Boro Morris Twp Morristown Town Randolph Twp Somerset               Bedminster Twp Bernards Twp Bernardsville Boro Bound Brook Boro Branchburg Twp Bridgewater Twp Far Hills Boro Franklin Twp Green Brook Twp Hillsborough Twp Manville Boro Millstone Boro Montgomery Twp North Plainfield Boro Peapack-Gladstone Boro Raritan Boro Rocky Hill Boro Somerville Boro South Bound Brook Boro Warren Twp Watchung Boro (5)  DELAWARE AND RARITAN CANAL GREENWAY Hunterdon            Delaware Twp Kingwood Twp Lambertville City Stockton Boro West Amwell Twp Mercer                   Ewing Twp Hamilton Twp Hopewell Twp Lawrence Twp Princeton Boro Trenton City Middlesex             New Brunswick City Plainsboro Twp South Brunswick Twp Somerset               Franklin Twp (6)  DELAWARE BAY WATERSHED GREENWAY Atlantic                  Buena Boro Buena Vista Twp Cape May             Dennis Twp Lower Twp Middle Twp Upper Twp Cumberland         Bridgeton City Commercial Twp Deerfield Twp Downe Twp Fairfield Twp Greenwich Twp Hopewell Twp Lawrence Twp Maurice River Twp Millville City Shiloh Boro Stow Creek Twp Upper Deerfield Twp Vineland City Gloucester             Clayton Boro Elk Twp Franklin Twp Glassboro Boro Monroe Twp Newfield Boro Salem                     Alloway Twp Carneys Point Twp Elmer Boro Elsinboro Twp Lower Alloways Creek Twp Mannington Twp Oldmans Twp Pennsville Twp Pilesgrove Twp Pittsgrove Twp Quinton Twp Upper Pittsgrove Twp Woodstown Boro (7)  DELAWARE RIVER WATERSHED GREENWAY Burlington             Bordentown City Bordentown Twp Chesterfield Twp Cinnaminson Twp Delanco Twp Delran Twp Eastampton Twp Hainesport Twp Lumberton Twp Mansfield Twp Medford Twp Moorestown Twp Mount Holly Twp Mount Laurel Twp North Hanover Twp Pemberton Twp Riverside Twp Southampton Twp Springfield Twp Westampton Twp Willingboro Twp Camden                Berlin Twp Camden City Clementon Boro Gibbsboro Boro Gloucester Twp Haddon Twp Lindenwold Boro Pine Hill Boro Voorhees Twp Gloucester             Deptford Twp East Greenwich Twp Elk Twp Greenwich Twp Harrison Twp Logan Twp National Park Boro South Harrison Twp West Deptford Twp Westville Boro Woolwich Twp Hunterdon            Alexandria Twp Delaware Twp Frenchtown Boro Kingwood Twp Lambertville City Stockton Boro West Amwell Twp Mercer                   Ewing Twp Hamilton Twp Hopewell Twp Robbinsville Twp Trenton City Monmouth           Allentown Boro Millstone Twp Upper Freehold Twp Ocean                    Jackson Twp Plumsted Twp Salem                     Oldmans Twp Pilesgrove Twp Upper Pittsgrove Twp (8)  HIGHLANDS GREENWAY Bergen                   Mahwah Twp Oakland Boro Hunterdon            Alexandria Twp Bethlehem Twp Bloomsbury Boro Califon Boro Clinton Town Clinton Twp Glen Gardner Boro Hampton Boro High Bridge Boro Holland Twp Lebanon Boro Lebanon Twp Milford Boro Tewksbury Twp Union Twp Morris                    Boonton Town Boonton Twp Butler Boro Chester Boro Chester Twp Denville Twp Dover Town Hanover Twp Harding Twp Jefferson Twp Kinnelon Boro Mendham Boro Mendham Twp Mine Hill Twp Montville Twp Morris Plains Boro Morris Twp Morristown Town Mount Arlington Boro Mount Olive Twp Mountain Lakes Boro Netcong Boro Parsippany-Troy Hills Twp Pequannock Twp Randolph Twp Riverdale Boro Rockaway Boro Rockaway Twp Roxbury Twp Victory Gardens Boro Washington Twp Wharton Boro Passaic                   Bloomingdale Boro Pompton Lakes Boro Ringwood Boro Wanaque Boro West Milford Twp Somerset               Bedminster Twp Bernards Twp Bernardsville Boro Far Hills Boro Peapack-Gladstone Boro Sussex                    Byram Twp Franklin Boro Green Twp Hamburg Boro Hardyston Twp Hopatcong Boro Ogdensburg Boro Sparta Twp Stanhope Boro Vernon Twp Warren                   Allamuchy Twp Alpha Boro Belvidere Town Franklin Twp Frelinghuysen Twp Greenwich Twp Hackettstown Town Harmony Twp Hope Twp Independence Twp Liberty Twp Lopatcong Twp Mansfield Twp Oxford Twp Phillipsburg Town Pohatcong Twp Washington Boro Washington Twp White Twp (9)  HISTORIC RESOURCES Allaire State Park Monmouth           Howell Twp Wall Twp Fort Mott Officers Quarters Salem                     Pennsville Twp Griggstown Muletenders Barracks Somerset               Franklin Twp Historic Sites Burlington             Medford Twp Monmouth Battlefield Monmouth           Freehold Twp Manalapan Twp New Bridge Landing Bergen                   New Milford Boro River Edge Boro Princeton Battlefield Mercer                   Princeton Boro Proprietary House Middlesex             Perth Amboy City Register Eligible Sites Somerset               Green Brook Twp Watchung Boro Rockingham Farmstead Somerset               Franklin Twp Twin Lights Monmouth           Highlands Boro Washington Crossing State Park Mercer                   Ewing Twp Hopewell Twp Waterloo Village Sussex                    Byram Twp Stanhope Boro (10)  NATURAL AREAS Bill Henry Pond Atlantic                  Egg Harbor Twp Budd Lake Bog Morris                    Mount Olive Twp Campus Swamp Camden                 Gloucester Twp Cheesequake State Park Middlesex             Old Bridge Twp Crossley Preserve Ocean                    Berkeley Twp Manchester Twp Five Acre Pond Atlantic                  Estell Manor City Gravel Hill Hunterdon            Holland Twp Great Piece Meadows/ Troy Meadows Essex                      Fairfield Twp Roseland Boro West Caldwell Twp Morris                    East Hanover Twp Hanover Twp Lincoln Park Boro Montville Twp Parsippany-Troy Hills Twp Pequannock Twp Passaic                   Wayne Twp Hamburg Mountain Sussex                    Hardyston Twp Vernon Twp Hidden Lake Camden                 Gloucester Twp High Mountain Passaic                   North Haledon Boro Wayne Twp Limestone Ridge Warren                   Blairstown Twp Long-A-Coming Branch Camden                 Winslow Twp Milford Bluffs Hunterdon            Holland Twp Mountain Lake Bog Warren                   White Twp Ogdensburg Fen Sussex                    Ogdensburg Boro Oswego River Natural Area Burlington             Washington Twp Phone-In-Fen Warren                   Hardwick Twp Ramapo Lake Natural Area Bergen                   Oakland Boro Passaic                   Ringwood Boro Wanaque Boro Ramapo Mountain Bergen                   Mahwah Twp Oakland Boro Passaic                   Pompton Lakes Boro Ringwood Boro Wanaque Boro Sourland Mountains Hunterdon            East Amwell Twp West Amwell Twp Mercer                   Hopewell Twp Somerset               Hillsborough Twp Montgomery Twp Strawberry Hill Mercer                   Hopewell Twp Sunfish Pond Warren                   Hardwick Twp Sweet Hollow Hunterdon            Alexandria Twp Holland Twp Troy Meadows Morris                    Parsippany-Troy Hills Twp Uttertown Bog Passaic                   West Milford Twp Washington Crossing State Park Mercer                   Hopewell Twp Wetlands Habitat/ Bog Turtle Sussex                    Frankford Twp Wantage Twp Whale Pond Monmouth           Ocean Twp Woodbine Bogs Cape May             Upper Twp (11)  NON-PROFIT CAMPS Youth Camps Bergen                   Mahwah Twp Burlington             Evesham Twp Medford Twp Tabernacle Twp Cumberland         Greenwich Twp Hopewell Twp Gloucester             Franklin Twp Hunterdon            East Amwell Twp Readington Twp Monmouth           Wall Twp Morris                    Kinnelon Boro Rockaway Boro Ocean                    Ocean Twp Passaic                   Ringwood Boro West Milford Twp Salem                     Alloway Twp Upper Pittsgrove Twp Somerset               Franklin Twp Sussex                    Byram Twp Hampton Twp Sandyston Twp Sparta Twp Stillwater Twp Vernon Twp Wantage Twp Warren                   Frelinghuysen Twp Hardwick Twp Independence Twp Mansfield Twp (12)  PINELANDS Atlantic                  Brigantine City Buena Boro Buena Vista Twp Corbin City Egg Harbor City Egg Harbor Twp Estell Manor City Folsom Boro Galloway Twp Hamilton Twp Hammonton Town Mullica Twp Port Republic City Weymouth Twp Burlington             Bass River Twp Evesham Twp Medford Lakes Boro Medford Twp New Hanover Twp North Hanover Twp Pemberton Twp Shamong Twp Southampton Twp Springfield Twp Tabernacle Twp Washington Twp Woodland Twp Wrightstown Boro Camden                Berlin Boro Berlin Twp Chesilhurst Boro Waterford Twp Winslow Twp Cape May             Dennis Twp Middle Twp Upper Twp Woodbine Boro Cumberland         Maurice River Twp Vineland City Gloucester             Franklin Twp Monroe Twp Ocean                    Barnegat Twp Beachwood Boro Berkeley Twp Eagleswood Twp Jackson Twp Lacey Twp Lakehurst Boro Little Egg Harbor Twp Manchester Twp Ocean Twp Plumsted Twp South Toms River Boro Stafford Twp Toms River Twp Tuckerton Boro (13)  RIDGE AND VALLEY GREENWAY Sussex                    Andover Boro Andover Twp Branchville Boro Frankford Twp Fredon Twp Green Twp Hampton Twp Lafayette Twp Montague Twp Newton Town Sandyston Twp Stillwater Twp Sussex Boro Walpack Twp Wantage Twp Warren                   Blairstown Twp Frelinghuysen Twp Hackettstown Town Hardwick Twp Hope Twp Knowlton Twp Liberty Twp (14)  URBAN PARKS Atlantic                  Atlantic City Pleasantville City Bergen                   Bergenfield Boro Cliffside Park Boro Edgewater Boro Garfield City Hackensack City Lodi Boro Burlington             Mount Holly Twp Pemberton Twp Willingboro Twp Camden                Camden City Gloucester City Gloucester Twp Lindenwold Boro Pennsauken Twp Winslow Twp Cumberland         Bridgeton City Millville City Vineland City Essex                      Belleville Twp Bloomfield Twp Caldwell Boro Cedar Grove Twp East Orange City Glen Ridge Boro Irvington Twp Maplewood Twp Montclair Twp Newark City Nutley Twp Orange City Twp South Orange Village Twp West Orange Twp Gloucester             Glassboro Boro Monroe Twp Paulsboro Boro Woodbury City Hudson                  Bayonne City East Newark Boro Guttenberg Town Harrison Town Hoboken City Jersey City Kearny Town North Bergen Twp Union City Weehawken Twp West New York Town Mercer                   Trenton City Middlesex             Carteret Boro Edison Twp New Brunswick City Old Bridge Twp Perth Amboy City Woodbridge Twp Monmouth           Asbury Park City Long Branch City Neptune City Boro Neptune Twp Ocean                    Brick Twp Lakewood Twp Passaic                   Clifton City Passaic City Paterson City Totowa Boro Salem                     Penns Grove Boro Salem City Union                     Elizabeth City Fanwood Boro Garwood Boro Hillside Twp Linden City Plainfield City Rahway City Roselle Boro Roselle Park Boro Union Twp Winfield Twp Warren                   Phillipsburg Town TOTAL $23,725,000 c.     The expenditure of funds appropriated pursuant to subsection a. of this section for any project listed in subsection b. of this section shall not require the approval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee, or its successor. d.    To the extent that moneys remain available after the projects listed in subsection b. of this section are offered funding pursuant thereto, any State project that previously received funding appropriated or reappropriated from any Green Acres bond act, any annual appropriations act, the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund, established pursuant to the Garden State Preservation Trust Act, P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.), or the Preserve New Jersey Green Acres Fund, established pursuant to section 6 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-48), for recreation and conservation purposes shall be eligible to receive additional funding, as determined by the Department of Environmental Protection, subject to the approval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee or its successor. For the purposes of this subsection, Green Acres bond act means P.L.2009, c.117, P.L.2007, c.119, P.L.1995, c.204, P.L.1992, c.88, and P.L.1989, c.183. 2.    a.   There is appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection the sum of $23,725,000 from dedicated corporation business tax revenues pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution in the Preserve New Jersey Green Acres Fund, established pursuant to section 6 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-48), for the acquisition, for recreation and conservation purposes, of lands throughout the State that have been damaged by, or may be prone to incurring damage caused by, storms or storm-related flooding, or that may buffer or protect other lands from such damage.  Of the amount appropriated pursuant to this subsection, the sum of $3,752,000 is available due to interest earnings on the dedicated corporation business tax revenues pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution. b.    The funds appropriated pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be allocated as follows: Project                  County                                  Municipality Amount BLUE ACRES $23,725,000 Every county                       Every municipality TOTAL $23,725,000 c.     The expenditure of moneys appropriated pursuant to this section is subject to the provisions of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.). 3.    a.   There is reappropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection the unexpended balances, due to project cancellations or cost savings, of the amounts appropriated or reappropriated from this act, any Green Acres bond act, any annual appropriations act, the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund, established pursuant to the Garden State Preservation Trust Act, P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.), or the Preserve New Jersey Green Acres Fund, established pursuant to section 6 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-48), for State projects to acquire or develop lands for recreation and conservation purposes, for the purpose of providing additional funding, as determined by the Department of Environmental Protection, to any State project that previously received funding appropriated or reappropriated from any Green Acres bond act, any annual appropriations act, the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund, or the Preserve New Jersey Green Acres Fund for recreation and conservation purposes or that receives funding approved pursuant to section 1 of this act, subject to the approval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee or its successor.  Any such additional funding provided from a Green Acres bond act may include administrative costs. b.    For the purposes of this section, Green Acres bond act means P.L.2009, c.117, P.L.2007, c.119, P.L.1995, c.204, P.L.1992, c.88, and P.L.1989, c.183. 4.  There is appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection the sum of $2,050,000 from dedicated corporation business tax revenues pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution in the Preserve New Jersey Green Acres Fund, established pursuant to section 6 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-48), for paying administrative costs associated with administering the applicable provisions of P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.).  Of the amount appropriated pursuant to this section, $1,025,000 shall be used for the paying administrative costs associated with administering the provisions of section 1 of this act and $1,025,000 shall be used for the paying administrative costs associated with administering the provisions of section 2 of this act. 5.    There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Preserve New Jersey Green Acres Fund, established pursuant to section 6 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-48), the sum of $41,983,000 to implement the provisions of this act. 6.    This act shall take effect immediately.